Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1036
Commission, defined.

Commission means the Public Service Commission.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1006;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 18.